Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-281
Patent issued to deceased person; effect.

Where patents for public lands have been or may be issued, in pursuance of any law of the State of Nebraska, to a person who has died, the title to the land designated therein shall inure to and become vested in the heirs, devisees or assignees of such deceased patentee as if the patent had issued to the deceased person during life.

Laws 1905, c. 64, § 1, p. 321;

R.S.1913, § 6249;

C.S.1922, § 5648;

C.S.1929, § 76-254;

R.S.1943, § 76-281.